Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Chapter 13. Inventories and Accounts.

§ 64.2-1300.
Inventories to be filed with commissioners of accounts.

Every personal representative or curator shall, within four months after the date of the order conferring his authority, return to the commissioner of accounts an inventory of all the personal estate under his supervision and control, the decedent’s interest in any multiple party account in any financial institution, all real estate over which he has the power of sale, and any other real estate that is an asset of the decedent’s estate, whether or not situated in the Commonwealth. Every personal representative or curator shall also return to the commissioner of accounts an inventory of any such assets discovered thereafter as provided in subsection E.

Every guardian of an estate, conservator, or committee shall, within four months after the date of the order conferring his authority, return to the commissioner of accounts an inventory of the ward’s personal estate under his supervision and control, the ward’s real estate, the ward’s legal or equitable ownership interest in any real or personal property that will pass to another at the ward’s death by a means other than testate or intestate succession, and any periodic payments of money to which the ward is entitled. Every guardian of an estate, conservator, or committee shall also return to the commissioner of accounts an inventory of any such assets discovered thereafter as provided in subsection E.

Every trustee who qualifies in the circuit court clerk’s office shall, within four months after the first date that any assets are received, return to the commissioner of accounts an inventory of the real and personal estate which is under the trustee’s supervision and control. Every such trustee shall also return to the commissioner of accounts an inventory of any such assets received thereafter as provided in subsection E. However, any trustee who is not required to account under the provisions of §

64.2-1307

shall be exempted from the duty to file an inventory for as long as there remains no duty to file annual accounts with the commissioner of accounts.

In listing property pursuant to subsection A, B, or C, the fiduciary shall place the market value on each item. The market value shall be determined as of (i) the date of death if a decedent’s estate; (ii) the date assets are received by the trustee if a trust; or (iii) the date of qualification in all other cases. Any reasonable expense incurred in determining such values shall be allowable as a cost of the administration of the estate.

In the case of assets discovered or received by a fiduciary after filing an inventory, the further inventory required by subsections A, B, and C may be made by filing an amended inventory showing all assets of the estate or trust, by filing an additional inventory showing only the after-discovered assets or, with the permission of the commissioner of accounts, by showing the after-discovered assets on the estate’s or trust’s next regular accounting. The filing shall be made or the permission granted within four months after the discovery or receipt of the assets.

History.

Code 1919, § 5403, § 26-12; 1932, p. 337; Code 1950, § 26-12; 1966, c. 337; 1973, c. 544; 1993, c. 581; 1997, c. 842; 1998, c. 610; 2001, c. 73; 2012, c. 614.

Research References.

Harrison on Wills and Administration for Virginia and West Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 13 Inventory and Appraisement. § 13.03 Inventory in Virginia. Chapter 26 Accounting and Distribution. § 26.05 In Virginia, et seq. Cox.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-724. Inventory for Estate of Incapacitated Adult; No. 15-420. Instructions for Inventory — Decedent’s Estate, et seq.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8A M.J. Executors and Administrators, §§ 39, 41, 197, 233.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Applicability of exemptions. —

Under §

64.2-1302

, only the claims of a creditor seeking qualification for the filing waiver must exceed the value of the estate in order for the exemptions provided to apply; what constitutes sufficient proof of a claim exceeding the value of the estate is a matter within the discretion of the clerk. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Brenda S. Hamilton, Clerk of Court, Circuit Court of the City of Roanoke, No. 14-059, 2014 Va. AG LEXIS 64 (11/20/14).

§ 64.2-1301.
When inventory and settlement not required.

An inventory under §

64.2-1300

or a settlement under §

64.2-1206

shall not be required of a personal representative who qualifies for the sole purpose of bringing an action under §

8.01-50

. However, if there is no surviving relative designated as a beneficiary under §

8.01-53

and the circuit court directs that the funds recovered in such action be paid to the personal representative for distribution according to law, the personal representative shall file the inventory required in §

64.2-1300

and the statement required under §

64.2-1206

.

History.

1966, c. 338, § 26-12.2; 2012, c. 614.

Law Review.

For article, “Civil Practice and Procedure,” see 45 U. Rich. L. Rev. 183 (2010).

Research References.

Harrison on Wills and Administration for Virginia and West Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 26 Accounting and Distribution. § 26.02 Duty to Keep Accounts and Make Settlements. Cox.

§ 64.2-1302.
Waiver of inventory and settlement for certain estates.

When a decedent’s personal estate passing by testate or intestate succession does not exceed $25,000 in value and an heir, beneficiary, or creditor whose claim exceeds the value of the estate seeks qualification, the clerk of the circuit court shall waive the inventory under §

64.2-1300

and the settlement under §

64.2-1206

. This section shall not apply if the decedent died owning any real estate over which the person seeking qualification would have the power of sale.

History.

1980, c. 563, § 26-12.3; 1987, c. 605; 1989, c. 387; 1998, c. 117; 2001, c. 598; 2002, cc. 220, 227; 2012, c. 614; 2014, c. 532.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 532 substituted “$25,000” for “$15,000.”

Law Review.

For article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 845 (2001).

For 2002 survey of Virginia law on wills, trusts, and estates, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 357 (2002).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Applicability of exemptions. —

Under §

64.2-1302

, only the claims of a creditor seeking qualification for the filing waiver must exceed the value of the estate in order for the exemptions provided to apply; what constitutes sufficient proof of a claim exceeding the value of the estate is a matter within the discretion of the clerk. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Brenda S. Hamilton, Clerk of Court, Circuit Court of the City of Roanoke, No. 14-059, 2014 Va. AG LEXIS 64 (11/20/14).

§ 64.2-1303.
Copies of inventories and accounts to be provided by personal representatives.

Every personal representative filing with the commissioner of accounts an inventory or account, including an affidavit of intent to file a statement in lieu of an account pursuant to §

64.2-1314

, or any document making changes to either, shall, on or before the date of such filing, send a copy thereof by first-class mail to those persons to whom notice was given pursuant to subsections A and B of §

64.2-508

and who requested the same from the personal representative in writing. Copies sent pursuant to this subsection need not include copies of any supporting vouchers and such copies need not be given to (i) persons who would take only as heirs at law in a case where all of the decedent’s probate estate is disposed of by will or (ii) beneficiaries whose gifts have been satisfied in full prior to such filing. A request for copies may be made to a personal representative at any time. The request may relate to one specific filing or to all filings to be made by the personal representative but it is not effective for filings made prior to its receipt by a personal representative.

No commissioner of accounts shall approve any personal representative’s inventory or account (i) until 21 days have elapsed from the receipt of such inventory or account and (ii) unless the inventory or account contains a statement that any copies requested pursuant to this section have been mailed and shows the names and addresses of the persons to whom they were mailed and the date of such mailing.

History.

2001, c. 265, § 26-12.4; 2012, c. 614.

Law Review.

For article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 845 (2001).

§ 64.2-1304.
Personal representatives.

Within 16 months from the date of the qualification, personal representatives shall exhibit before the commissioner of accounts a statement of all money and other property that the fiduciary has received, has become chargeable with, or has disbursed within 12 months from the date of qualification.

After the first account of the fiduciary has been filed and settled, the second and subsequent accounts for each succeeding 12-month period shall be due within four months from the last day of the 12-month period commencing on the terminal date of the preceding account unless the commissioner of accounts extends the period for filing upon reasonable cause.

Notwithstanding subsections A and B, a personal representative may file a first or subsequent account at an earlier date, and the commissioner of accounts or the circuit court may require the personal representative to file a first or subsequent account at an earlier date upon reasonable cause shown.

History.

1993, c. 689, § 26-17.5; 2012, c. 614.

Law Review.

For article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 845 (2001).

§ 64.2-1305.
Conservators, guardians of minors’ estates, committees, trustees under § 64.2-2016, and receivers.

Within six months from the date of the qualification, conservators, guardians of minors’ estates, committees, and trustees under §

64.2-2016

shall exhibit before the commissioner of accounts a statement of all money and other property that the fiduciary has received, has become chargeable with, or has disbursed within four months from the date of qualification.

After the first account of the fiduciary has been filed and settled, the second and subsequent accounts for each succeeding 12-month period shall be due within four months from the last day of the 12-month period commencing on the terminal date of the preceding account unless the commissioner of accounts extends the period for filing upon reasonable cause.

For fiduciaries acting on behalf of Medicaid recipients, the fees charged by the commissioners of accounts under subsection A or B shall not exceed $25.

Any account filed with the commissioner pursuant to this section shall be signed under oath by the fiduciary making such filing. If a fiduciary makes a false entry or statement in such a filing, he shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than $500. Such penalty shall be collected by the attorney for the Commonwealth or the county or city attorney, and the proceeds shall be deposited into the general fund.

History.

1993, c. 689, § 26-17.4; 1997, cc. 214, 921; 1999, cc. 16, 378; 2012, c. 614; 2020, cc. 190, 372.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by cc. 281 and 372 are identical, and added subsection D.

Law Review.

For annual survey article on wills, trusts, and estates, see 40 U. Rich. L. Rev. 381 (2005).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-726 Account for Incapacitated Adult; No. 15-479 Account for Incapacitated Adult, et seq.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8A M.J. Executors and Administrators, § 193.

§ 64.2-1306.
Testamentary trustees.

Except as provided in subsections B and C, testamentary trustees shall exhibit a statement of all money and other property that the fiduciary has received, has become chargeable with, or has disbursed for each calendar year before the commissioner of accounts of the circuit court where the order conferring his authority was entered on an annual basis commencing on or before May 1 of the calendar year following initial funding of the trust. Accounts for each calendar year thereafter shall be filed on or before May 1 of the following calendar year.

All testamentary trustees who qualify prior to July 1, 1993, and elect to file accounts on a fiscal year basis may continue to file such accounts on an annual basis within four months after the end of the fiscal year selected.

Accountings for trusts where one of the trustees is a corporation qualified under §

6.2-803

, and by other testamentary trustees permitted by the Internal Revenue Code to file income tax returns on a fiscal year, may be filed on the basis of the trust fiscal year. The first account shall be filed within 16 months of the date on which the trust was initially funded.

History.

1993, c. 689, § 26-17.6; 2012, c. 614.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Trustee to file accountings. —

Where neither will establishing the testamentary trusts waived the statutory obligation of the trustee to file accountings, the trial court declined to re-write the testators will and waive the accounting requirement, even where the trustee was also the sole beneficiary of the trusts.
In re Rauth, 66 Va. Cir. 315, 2004 Va. Cir. LEXIS 309 (Fairfax County Dec. 22, 2004) (decided under prior law).

§ 64.2-1307.
Testamentary trustees under a will waiving accounts; waiver where beneficiary also trustee.

For purposes of this section, the term “sole beneficiary” means a person who is (i) the only income beneficiary who is entitled to the principal, or the remaining principal goes to the trustee’s estate or (ii) the only income beneficiary and has either a general power of appointment over the principal or has a special power of appointment that is not limited to a particular class of persons.

If (i) the will of a decedent probated on or after July 1, 1993, contains a waiver of the obligations of the testamentary trustee nominated therein to account or (ii) the sole beneficiary of the trust also is a trustee, the trustee will not be required to file accounts with the commissioner of accounts.Where the waiver is contained in the decedent’s will, the trustee shall within 90 days after qualification notify in writing all beneficiaries of the trust, other than the trustee, who are adults, whose addresses are known to the trustee, and to whom income or principal of the trust could be currently distributed; provide each such beneficiary with a copy of the applicable provisions of the will; advise each such beneficiary of his right to require an annual accounting; and provide each such beneficiary with a copy of this section and annually thereafter provide each such beneficiary an accounting upon request. The trustee shall send to the commissioner of accounts a copy of the notice given to each beneficiary or, in the alternative, file a writing with the commissioner of accounts stating that the requirements of this section have been met. For receiving and filing such notice or writing, the commissioner of accounts shall be allowed a fee not to exceed $25.

Language substantially in form and effect as follows shall be sufficient to constitute a waiver in the will of the decedent of the trustee’s obligation to account: “I hereby direct that my trustee(s) shall not be required to file annual accounts with a court as otherwise required by Virginia law.”

Notwithstanding a waiver in the will of the decedent or any prior consent of a beneficiary, any such adult beneficiary may, at any time during the administration of the trust, demand in a writing delivered to the trustee and to the commissioner of accounts that the trustee settle annually with the commissioner of accounts. Upon notice of such demand to the trustee and the commissioner of accounts, such trustee shall file an account with the commissioner of accounts for a period acceptable to the commissioner of accounts as though there were no waiver by the testator. The beneficiary making such demand may later revoke his demand by a writing delivered to the trustee and the commissioner of accounts. The demand for settlement of the trustee’s account before the commissioner of accounts may also be made by the personal representative of a deceased beneficiary whose estate is a beneficiary, an attorney-in-fact for a beneficiary, a guardian of an incapacitated beneficiary, a committee of a convict or insane beneficiary, the duly qualified guardian of a minor, or if none exists, a custodial parent of a minor or by any minor who has attained 14 years of age.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, any trustee under a will of a decedent containing the requisite waiver, whenever probated, shall be relieved of the duty to file an inventory or annual accounts with the commissioner of accounts if the trustee (i) obtains the written consent of all adult beneficiaries, other than the trustee, to whom income or principal of the trust could be currently distributed, after providing those beneficiaries with the documents and information specified in subsection B, and (ii) files those consents with the commissioner of accounts on or before the date on which the inventory or next required accounting would otherwise be due. For receiving and filing such written consent, the commissioner of accounts shall be allowed a fee not to exceed $25.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, any trustee under a will of a decedent probated on or after July 1, 2010, shall be relieved of the duty to file an inventory or annual accounts with the commissioner of accounts if the will of the decedent does not direct the filing of such inventory or accounts and the trustee (i) obtains the written consent of all adult beneficiaries, other than the trustee, to whom income or principal of the trust could be currently distributed, after providing those beneficiaries with the documents and information specified in subsection B; (ii) obtains the written consent of the representatives of all incapacitated beneficiaries, other than the trustee, to whom income or principal of the trust could be currently distributed, after providing those representatives with the documents and information specified in subsection B; and (iii) files those consents with the commissioner of accounts on or before the date on which the inventory or next required accounting would otherwise be due. For receiving and filing such written consent, the commissioner of accounts shall be allowed a fee not to exceed $25. The consent of an incapacitated beneficiary may be made by the personal representative of a deceased beneficiary whose estate is a beneficiary, an attorney-in-fact for a beneficiary, a guardian of an incapacitated beneficiary, a committee of a convict or insane beneficiary, the duly qualified guardian of a minor, or if none exists, a custodial parent of a minor who is not also the trustee. Language substantially in form and effect as follows shall be sufficient to constitute a direction in the will of the decedent of the trustee’s obligation to account: “I hereby direct that my trustee(s) shall be required to file annual accounts with a court as otherwise required by Virginia law.”

A circuit court having jurisdiction may order the filing of annual accounts if it deems such filings to be in the best interests of one or more beneficiaries of the trust.

History.

1993, c. 689, § 26-17.7; 2001, c. 73; 2005, c. 821; 2010, cc. 197, 651; 2012, c. 614.

Law Review.

For article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 845 (2001).

For annual survey article on wills, trusts, and estates, see 40 U. Rich. L. Rev. 381 (2005).

For article, “Medical Malpractice Law,” see 45 U. Rich. L. Rev. 319 (2010).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 15-491 Testamentary Trustee’s Notice to Beneficiaries Pursuant to Va. Code Ann. §

64.2-1307

.

§ 64.2-1308.
Forms for inventories and accounts.

The Office of the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court shall provide to each circuit court clerk forms and instructions for the inventories required by §

64.2-1300

and forms and instructions for accounts. The clerk shall provide the appropriate forms to every fiduciary who qualifies in the clerk’s office. An inventory filed pursuant to §

64.2-1300

or an account filed pursuant to §

64.2-1206

may be made on the form provided to the fiduciary by the clerk of the court, on a computer-generated facsimile of the appropriate form, or in any other clear format.

History.

1966, c. 336, §§ 26-12.1, 26-17.3; 1972, c. 411; 1993, cc. 581, 689, § 26-17.3; 1997, c. 842; 2012, c. 614.

Research References.

Enforcement of Judgments and Liens in Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 10 Foreclosure of a Deed of Trust and a UCC Security Interest.
§ 10.4 The Sale.
Rendleman.

Harrison on Wills and Administration for Virginia and West Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 13 Inventory and Appraisement § 13.05 What Property Included. Cox.

§ 64.2-1309.
Accounts of sales under deeds of trust.

Within six months after the date of a sale made under any recorded deed of trust, mortgage, or assignment for benefit of creditors, other than under a decree, the trustee shall return an account of the sale to the commissioner of accounts of the circuit court where the instrument was first recorded. After recording any trustee’s deed, the trustee shall promptly deliver to the commissioner of accounts a copy of the deed. The date of sale is the date specified in the notice of sale, or any postponement thereof, as required by subsection A of §

55.1-321

. The commissioner of accounts shall state, settle, and report to the court an account of the transactions of the trustee, which shall be recorded as other fiduciary reports. Any trustee failing to comply with this section shall forfeit his commissions on such sale, unless such commissions are allowed by the court.

If the commissioner of accounts of the court where an instrument was first recorded becomes aware that an account as required by this section has not been filed, the commissioner of accounts and the court shall proceed against the trustee and impose penalties in the same manner as set forth in §

64.2-1215

, unless the trustee is excused for sufficient reason. If after a deed of trust is given on land located in a county, and before a sale under the deed of trust, the land is taken within the limits of the incorporated city, the returns of the trustee and settlement of his accounts shall be before the commissioner of accounts of such city.

Whenever the commissioner of accounts reports to the court that a fiduciary who is an attorney-at-law licensed to practice in the Commonwealth has failed to make the required return within 30 days after the date of service of a summons, the commissioner of accounts shall also mail a copy of his report to the Virginia State Bar.

History.

Code 1919, § 5404; 1946, p. 325; Code 1950, § 26-15; 1966, c. 333; 1980, c. 148; 1996, c. 681; 1997, c. 842; 1998, c. 610; 2003, c. 193; 2012, c. 614.

Editor’s note.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “55.1-321” for “55-59.1.”

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on wills, trusts, and estates for year 1979-80, see 67 Va. L. Rev. 369 (1981).

Research References.

Enforcement of Judgments and Liens in Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 10 Foreclosure of a Deed of Trust and a UCC Security Interest.
§ 10.4 The Sale.
Rendleman.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 5-2001 Petition for Payment of Funds into Court; No. 6-902.1 Foreclosure Checklist, et seq.; No. 16-823 Trustee’s Duties upon Default, et seq.

§ 64.2-1310.
Recordation of inventories and accounts of sales.

Every inventory and account of sales returned under §§

64.2-1300

and

64.2-1309

shall be recorded by the clerk in the will book and indexed as required by §

17.1-223

.

History.

Code 1919, § 5405; Code 1950, § 26-16; 2012, c. 614.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

15 M.J. Recording Acts, § 6.

§ 64.2-1311.
Vouchers and statement of assets on hand; direct payments to account; vouchers for IRS payments.

Vouchers for disbursements and a statement of cash on hand or in a bank and all investments held at the terminal date of the account shall also be exhibited with each account. A voucher shall not be required when a disbursement, not exceeding the value of $50, is made to a legatee under the authority of a will and such legatee refuses to take the possession or fails to present the disbursement check to a bank for payment. In such case the fiduciary shall file an affidavit stating that he has made a good faith effort to comply with the terms of the will and the provisions of this section.

A fiduciary may make payment to a beneficiary by transfer to the beneficiary’s bank account with the fiduciary or by payment to an account with another bank through an automated clearinghouse, wire transfer, or similar mechanism, if the beneficiary has consented in writing to such method of payment. In either case, a record or statement of the bank making such payment shall be a sufficient voucher for the purpose of subsection A.

In the case of payments to the Internal Revenue Service for income tax estimates or any other payments required or permitted to be made by wire transfer or similar mechanism, a record or statement of the bank making such payment shall be a sufficient voucher for the purpose of subsection A.

In the case of payments of debts, taxes, and expenses, a corporate fiduciary’s affidavit signed by an officer familiar with the facts that describes each payment by date, payee, purpose, and amount shall be a sufficient voucher for the purpose of subsection A. However, the commissioner of accounts may require that the corporate fiduciary exhibit a voucher for a specific payment.

In the event a fiduciary seeks to use a check as a voucher or receipt under this section, (i) a copy of both sides of the check shall be sufficient or (ii) a copy of the front side of the check and the periodic statement from the financial institution showing the check number and amount that coincides with the copy shall be sufficient, provided that (a) the copy was made in the regular course of business in accordance with the admissibility requirements of §

8.01-391

and (b) the commissioner of accounts may require a fiduciary to exhibit a proper voucher for a specific payment or for distributions to beneficiaries or distributees. However, the commissioner of accounts shall not require a fiduciary to exhibit an original check as a voucher under this subsection.

History.

1993, c. 689, § 26-17.9; 1999, c. 74; 2003, c. 201; 2005, cc. 261, 277; 2012, c. 614; 2014, c. 532.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 532, in subsection A, substituted “$50” for “$25.”

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia wills, trusts and estates law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1069 (2000).

For annual survey article on wills, trusts, and estates, see 40 U. Rich. L. Rev. 381 (2005).

§ 64.2-1312.
Report to circuit court; death of fiduciary; fiduciary for recipient of federal benefits.

The commissioner of accounts shall state, settle, and report to the circuit court an account of the transactions of a fiduciary, as provided by law. Every fiduciary shall also, at the request of the commissioner of accounts, exhibit (i) the securities held by the fiduciary together with a statement from every bank in which cash is held at the terminal date of the account and (ii) proof that all premiums due upon any required surety bond have been paid.

If a personal representative of a decedent’s estate, a testamentary trustee, a guardian, a conservator, or a committee dies prior to the filing and settlement of the fiduciary’s account, the personal representative of the fiduciary’s estate shall have the obligation to make the requisite filing and settlement through the date of death unless any successor fiduciary makes the requisite filing.

For fiduciaries acting on behalf of a recipient of social security, supplemental security income, or veteran’s or other federal benefits, no accounting to the commissioner of accounts shall be required of benefits paid to a designated representative on behalf of the recipient if the representative is otherwise required to account for such benefits. However, any fiduciary otherwise required to make an accounting to the commissioner of accounts shall disclose in the account the total amount of such benefits received during the accounting period for which no incremental fee for such benefits shall be charged by the commissioner of accounts.

History.

1993, c. 689, § 26-17.10; 1997, c. 801; 1999, c. 108; 2000, c. 324; 2012, c. 614.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia wills, trusts and estates law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1069 (2000).

Research References.

Harrison on Wills and Administration for Virginia and West Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 26 Accounting and Distribution. § 26.02 Duty to Keep Accounts and Make Settlements. Cox.

§ 64.2-1313.
Exhibition of accounts when sum does not exceed certain amount.

If the principal sum held by any fiduciary mentioned in §

64.2-1206

does not exceed $25,000, the fiduciary shall exhibit his accounts before the commissioner of accounts within the appropriate time period provided in §§

64.2-1305

,

64.2-1306

, and

64.2-1307

. Thereafter, the commissioner of accounts may permit the fiduciary to exhibit his accounts every three years, which permission may be revoked by the commissioner of accounts on his own motion or upon request of any interested person. The provisions of this section shall apply to any case in which the corpus of the estate in the hands of the fiduciary has been reduced to $25,000 or less although it formerly exceeded that amount. Any fiduciary exhibiting his accounts in accordance with the provisions of this section shall be entitled to compensation for his services.

History.

1934, p. 80; Michie Code 1942, § 5409a; 1946, p. 326; Code 1950, § 26-20; 1962, c. 148; 1976, c. 435; 1999, c. 378; 2002, cc. 220, 227; 2003, c. 193; 2012, c. 614; 2014, c. 532.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 532 substituted “$25,000” for “$15,000” twice.

Law Review.

For 2002 survey of Virginia law on wills, trusts, and estates, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 357 (2002).

For survey article on the law pertaining to wills, trusts, and estates, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 267 (2003).

§ 64.2-1314.
Statement in lieu of settlement of accounts by personal representatives in certain circumstances.

For the purposes of this section, the term “residuary beneficiary” shall not include the trustee of a trust that receives a residuary gift under a decedent’s will.

If all distributees of a decedent’s estate or all residuary beneficiaries under a decedent’s will are personal representatives of that decedent’s estate, whether serving alone or with others who are not distributees or residuary beneficiaries, the personal representatives may, in lieu of the settlement of accounts required by §

64.2-1304

, file with the commissioner of accounts a statement under oath that (i) all known charges against the estate have been paid, (ii) six months have elapsed since the personal representatives qualified in the clerk’s office, and (iii) the residue of the estate has been delivered to the distributees or beneficiaries. In the case of a residuary beneficiary, the statement shall include an itemized listing, substantiated and accompanied by proper vouchers, showing satisfaction of all other bequests in the will. The statement shall be considered an account stated and subject to all the provisions of this chapter applicable to accounts stated.

If the statement authorized by this section cannot be filed with the commissioner of accounts within the time prescribed by §

64.2-1304

, the personal representatives, within that time, shall file either (i) an interim account or (ii) a written notice under oath that the personal representatives intend to file a statement in lieu of the settlement of accounts when all requirements of this section have been met, which shall include an explanation of why such a statement cannot presently be filed. Second and subsequent interim accounts or notices of intent to file shall be filed annually until the statement in lieu of the settlement of accounts is filed. A commissioner of accounts who determines that the reasons offered for not presently filing a statement in lieu of settlement are not sufficient, whether in a first or subsequent written notice, may require the personal representatives to file an interim account in addition to the notice. The filing of an interim account shall not preclude the filing of a subsequent statement.

History.

1960, c. 428, § 26-20.1; 1972, c. 326; 1975, c. 192; 1980, c. 199; 1981, c. 113; 1983, c. 328; 1984, c. 309; 1993, c. 525; 1998, c. 610; 2001, c. 107; 2012, c. 614; 2017, c. 638.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 638 deleted former subsection D, which read: “For examining and approving a statement and vouchers or a written notice under the provisions of this section, the commissioner of accounts shall be allowed a fee not to exceed $ 75.”

Law Review.

For article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 845 (2001).

§ 64.2-1315.
Certification and recording of accounts settled in a judicial proceeding.

When the account of any fiduciary is settled in a judicial proceeding, it shall be the duty of the clerk of the circuit court in which the judicial proceeding was held, as soon as may be practicable after entry of a final order, to certify to the clerk of the circuit court in which the fiduciary qualified a copy of the account so far as the account has been confirmed, with a memorandum at the foot of the copy stating the style of the suit and the date of the final order. The account and memorandum so certified shall be recorded by the clerk to whom it is certified in the book in which accounts of fiduciaries are required to be recorded under §

64.2-1214

. If in a proceeding subsequent to the entry of the final order, the account is reformed or altered, a copy of such reformed or altered account shall be certified and recorded, together with a memorandum stating the style of the suit and the date of the order or decree of confirmation, in the same manner as the final order. When the judicial proceeding is conducted in the same court in which the fiduciary qualified, the clerk of such court shall make the memoranda and recordations required by this section, and shall for such purpose use the original papers. For making any copy under this section, the clerk shall be entitled to the fees prescribed in like cases, and for recording such account of the fiduciary he shall be entitled to the fees allowed for recording accounts settled ex parte. The fees for copying and recording shall be paid as the court in which the judicial proceeding was held shall direct.

History.

Code 1919, § 5411; Code 1950, § 26-21; 2005, c. 681; 2012, c. 614.

Research References.

Harrison on Wills and Administration for Virginia and West Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 12 Grant of Administration.
§ 12.15 The Bond. Cox.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 15-401 Checklist for Probate and Administration, et seq.

§ 64.2-1316.
Settlement of fiduciary’s accounts by commissioner in chancery; report to commissioner of accounts.

On the motion of any fiduciary having charge of an estate or any interested person, the circuit court may require a commissioner in chancery to settle the accounts of the fiduciary. In addition, a court may require a commissioner in chancery to settle the accounts of any of the fiduciaries mentioned in this chapter. A commissioner in chancery making a settlement under such order of a court shall report the fact and date of the settlement to the commissioner of accounts within 30 days, who shall make an entry of the same in his record book.

History.

Code 1919, § 5415; Code 1950, § 26-25; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-1317.
Disposition of papers relating to estates.

The circuit court or the clerk at the time of the confirmation of an account shall return all inventories and original accounts of sales filed with the clerk of the circuit court as required by §§

64.2-1205

and

64.2-1310

, all reports filed with the clerk under §

64.2-1214

when the reports have been actually recorded by the clerk, compared, indexed, and confirmed as required by law, and all vouchers or other evidence filed with the commissioner of accounts upon request made at the time of such filing, or in the discretion of the commissioner of accounts if no request is made, to the fiduciary or other person who filed such inventories, accounts, reports, vouchers, or other evidence, provided, however, that such inventories, accounts, reports, vouchers, or other evidence is not required as evidence of any further matter of inquiry pending before the court or the commissioner of accounts.

The clerk of court may destroy any papers mentioned in subsection A or any other papers relating to estates, when the matter concerned has been closed with a final settlement for more than three years and appropriate recordations have been made. However, nothing in this section shall apply to original documents recorded by binding. If recordation is done by facsimile or microfilm reproduction process, such papers may be destroyed if the return of such papers was not requested at the time of filing for recordation.

The commissioner of accounts may destroy any papers mentioned in subsection A or any other papers relating to estates when the matter concerned has been closed with a confirmed final accounting for more than one year.

History.

Code 1919, § 5428; 1922, p. 873; 1928, p. 24; 1940, p. 614; 1944, p. 107; 1950, p. 818, § 26-37; 1962, c. 111; 1977, c. 96; 1997, c. 842; 2012, c. 614.